Nebraska, session 109, LB789.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB789 LB789
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 27-804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
27-804 (1) Unavailability as a witness includes situations in which
the declarant:
(a) Is exempted by ruling of the judge on the ground of privilege
from testifying concerning the subject matter of the declarant's his
statement; or
(b) Persists in refusing to testify concerning the subject matter of
the declarant's his statement despite an order of the judge to do so; or
(c) Testifies to lack of memory of the subject matter of the
declarant's his statement; or
(d) Is unable to be present or to testify at the hearing because of
death or then existing physical or mental illness or infirmity; or
(e) Is absent from the hearing and the proponent of the declarant's
his statement has been unable to procure the declarant's his attendance
by process or other reasonable means.
A declarant is not unavailable as a witness if the declarant's his
exemption, refusal, claim of lack of memory, inability, or absence is due
to the procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of the declarant's his
statement for the purpose of preventing the witness from attending or
testifying.
(2) Subject to the provisions of section 27-403, the following are
not excluded by the hearsay rule if the declarant is unavailable as a
witness:
(a) Testimony given as a witness at another hearing of the same or a
different proceeding, or in a deposition taken in compliance with law in
the course of the same or a different proceeding, at the instance of or
against a party with an opportunity to develop the testimony by direct,
cross, or redirect examination, with motive and interest similar to those
of the party against whom now offered;
(b) A statement made by a declarant while believing that the
-2-

LB789 LB789
2026 2026
declarant's his death was imminent, concerning the cause or circumstances
of what the declarant he believed to be the declarant's his impending
death;
(c) A statement which was at the time of its making so far contrary
to the declarant's pecuniary or proprietary interest, or so far tended to
subject the declarant him to civil or criminal liability or to render
invalid a claim by the declarant him against another, that a reasonable
person man in the declarant's his position would not have made the
statement unless such person he believed it to be true. A statement
tending to expose the declarant to criminal liability and offered to
exculpate the accused is not admissible unless corroborating
circumstances clearly indicate the trustworthiness of the statement;
(d)(i) A statement concerning the declarant's own birth, adoption,
marriage, divorce, legitimacy, relationship by blood, adoption, or
marriage, ancestry, or other similar fact of personal or family history,
even though declarant had no means of acquiring personal knowledge of the
matter stated; or (ii) a statement concerning the foregoing matters, and
death also, of another person, if the declarant was related to the other
by blood, adoption, or marriage or was so intimately associated with the
other's family as to be likely to have accurate information concerning
the matter declared; or
(e) A statement offered against a party that wrongfully caused, or
acquiesced in wrongfully causing, the declarant's unavailability as a
witness, and did so intending that result; or
(f) (e) A statement not specifically covered by any of the foregoing
exceptions but having equivalent circumstantial guarantees of
trustworthiness, if the court determines that (i) the statement is
offered as evidence of a material fact, (ii) the statement is more
probative on the point for which it is offered than any other evidence
which the proponent can procure through reasonable efforts, and (iii) the
general purposes of these rules and the interests of justice will best be
-3-

LB789 LB789
2026 2026
served by admission of the statement into evidence. A statement may not
be admitted under this exception unless the proponent of it makes known
to the adverse party, sufficiently in advance of the trial or hearing to
provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to prepare to meet it,
the proponent's his intention to offer the statement and the particulars
of it, including the name and address of the declarant.
Sec. 2. Original section 27-804, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-